Utah statutes.
26-4-8.   Discovery of dead body -- Notice requirements -- Procedure.
(1)  When death occurs under circumstances listed in Section 26-4-7, the
person or persons finding or having custody of the body shall immediately
notify the nearest law enforcement agency. The law enforcement agency having
jurisdiction over the case shall then proceed to the place where the body is
and conduct an investigation concerning the cause and circumstances of death
for the purpose of determining whether there exists any criminal
responsibility for the death.
(2)  On a determination by the law enforcement agency that death may have
occurred in any of the ways described in Section 26-4-7, the death shall be
reported to the district attorney or county attorney having criminal
jurisdiction and to the medical examiner by the law enforcement agency having
jurisdiction over the investigation.
(3)  The report shall be made by the most expeditious means available. Failure
to give notification or report to the district attorney or county attorney
having criminal jurisdiction and medical examiner is a class B misdemeanor.
